apertium-kaz.kaz.leipzig.lexc
LEXICON PRON-DEM-ANA

: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<GEN%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<DAT%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ACC%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ABL%>:дан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<LOC%>:да CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<INSCOM%>:мен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<INSCOM%>:менен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
%<GEN%>:нікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<LATT%>:дағы CASES ;
%<SML%>:дай CASES ;

%<PL%>:лар CASES-ETC ;
%<PL%>%<POSS.3SP%>:лар%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON DemonstrativePronouns

PRON-DEM-BUL ;
PRON-DEM-MINA ;
PRON-DEM-MINAU ;
ана%<PRO%>:ана PRON-DEM-ANA ;

сол%<PRO%>:сол CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
сол%<PRO%>:со PRON-DEM-INFL ;
сол%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:сонымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
сол%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:соныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
сол%<PRO%>%<POSS.3SP%>:сонысы%{n%} CASES ;

ол%<PRO%>:ол CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ол%<PRO%>:о PRON-DEM-INFL ;
ол%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:онымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ол%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:оныменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
ол%<PRO%>%<POSS.3SP%>:онысы%{n%} CASES ;

осы%<PRO%>:осы CLITICS-NO-COP ;
осы%<PRO%>:осы PRON-DEM-INFL ;
осы%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:осымен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
осы%<PRO%>%<INSCOM%>:осыменен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
осы%<PRO%>%<POSS.3SP%>:осысы%{n%} CASES ;

!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<PRO%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;


LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI-CASES

: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<GEN%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<DAT%>:ған CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ACC%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ABL%>:дан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<LOC%>:да CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<INSCOM%>:мен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<INSCOM%>:менен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

%<PRO%>: PRON-ITG-QAYSI-CASES ;
%<PRO%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANSHA

%<PRO%>: CASES ;

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

қайсы:қайсы PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
қанша:қанша PRON-ITG-QANSHA ;
қандай:қандай PRON-ITG-INFL ;
нәрсе:нәрсе PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "thing" ! Use/MT
не:не PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
немене:немене PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кім:кім PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<PRO%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<PRO%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<PRO%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON PRON-IND-PL

%<PRO%>%<PL%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<PRO%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<PRO%>: GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASES-ETC ;
:ше CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

%<PRO%>%<POSS.1SG%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<PRO%>%<POSS.2SG%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<PRO%>%<POSS.3SP%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ; ! FIXME <px3sg>?
%<PRO%>%<POSS.1PL%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<PRO%>%<px2pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<PRO%>%<px3pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<PRO%>%<POSS.2SPF%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<PRO%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<PRO%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<PRO%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<PRO%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<PRO%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<PRO%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     OTHER PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS

LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<NN%>: # ;
%<NN%>:%- POSSESSIVES ;
%<NN%>:%- CASES-ETC ;
%<NN%>: CASES-ETC ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON N1

%<NN%>: # ;
%<NN%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N1-Ә

:%{ә%} N1 ;            ! generate front for {I} and back for {A} - куәні, куәға
:ә%{ъ%} N1 ;  ! Dir/LR ! analyse all back forms
:ә N1 ;       ! Dir/LR ! analyse all front forms

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;       ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<NN%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<NN%>%<PL%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)
                                                      !  FIXME CHECK: Is {S} needed here ?

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-PL
! for things like Олимпиада ойындары

%<NN%>%<PL%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ; ! FIXME: do we want these to get <pl>??


LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<NN%>: # ;
%<NN%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N5

:%{☭%} N1 ;

LEXICON N6

:%{і%} N1 ;
N1 ;  ! Dir/LR     ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                   ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

LEXICON N-INFL-NKI

%<NN%>:%{I%}н KI ; ! Dir/LR - common variant in both Kazakh and Kyrgyz
%<NN%>:%{I%}ң KI ;
%<NN%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP

%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-RUS

%<NNP%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<NNP%>: # ;

%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
%<NNP%>:%- NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-COMPOUND

%<NNP%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<NNP%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<NNP%>:%- NP-COMMON ;

%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR


LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>%<PL%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>%<PL%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything

%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<NNP%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>%<PL%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а.
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<NNP%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<NNP%>%<PL%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<NNP%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>%<PL%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;


LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<NNP%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>%<PL%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<NNP%>:вич%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

%<NNP%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<NNP%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<NNP%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-LAT

%<NNP%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<NNP%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<NNP%>:%- FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND

%<NNP%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;   ! COMMON because no plural

LEXICON NP-ORG-ABBR             ! for abbreviations like FIFA
%<NNP%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<NNP%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -

LEXICON NP-AL

%<NNP%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-AL-ABBR              ! for abbreviations like ӘЧ - Әлем Чемпионаты
%<NNP%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<NNP%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<NNP%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -


LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<NUM%>: # ;
%<NUM%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<NUM%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;             ! FIXME: base form, <det> reading
%<NUM%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-TWENTY

NUM-COMMON ;
%<NUM%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;
%<NUM%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<NUM%>: # ;
%<NUM%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<NUM%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<NUM%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<NUM%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<NUM%>: # ;

LEXICON LTR

%<SYM%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<ADP%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<ADP%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON KI

:%>%{G%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
:%>%{G%}%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON ADV

%<ADV%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<ADV%>: KI ;
%<ADV%>%<ABL%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ; ! FIXME: overgenerates a bit

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-I     ! Used for бері<adv>/бергі<adv><attr> 'right now' and similar

:%{I%} ADV ;
%<ADV%>: KI ;

 LEXICON Postpositions
сайын:сайын POST ; ! "every" + NOM
қарағанда:қарағанда POST ; ! "according to; than(?)" + DAT
түстес:түстес POST ; ! ""
 LEXICON Determiners
әлгі:әлгі DET-DEM ; ! "~этот"
ол:ол DET-DEM ;
ол:ол DET-DEM ;
осынау:осынау DET-DEM ;
әр:һәр DET-QNT ; ! "every" Dir/LR
бірнеше:бірнеше DET-QNT ; ! "some"
көп:көп DET-QNT ; ! "many"
миллиардтаған:миллиардтаған DET-QNT ; ! ""
бір:бір PRON-IND ; ! "a"
кейбір:кейбір DET-IND ; ! "some"
қай%-қайсы:қай%-қайсы DET-IND ; ! "whoever"
бірер:бірер DET-IND ; ! ""
осындай:осындай DET-IND ; ! "such"
қай:қай DET-ITG ; ! "which"
қайсы:қайсы DET-ITG ; ! "which"
кім:кім DET-ITG ; ! !"whose" Use/MT
ешбір:ешбір DET-NEG ; ! "none, no"
ешқандай:ешқандай DET-NEG ; ! "no [kind of], none"
еш:еш DET-NEG ; ! "none"
өз:өз DET-REF ; ! "oneself's"
 LEXICON Nouns
Будда:будда N3 ; ! ""
Раббы:раббы N3 ; ! ""
Рамазан:рамазан N3 ; ! ""
авторлық:авторлық N3 ; ! ""
еңбекші:еңбекші N1 ; ! "labourer,worker"
инфляция:инфляция N5 ; ! ""
контракт:контракт N6 ; ! ""
куә:ку N1-Ә ; ! "witness"
кінә:кін N1-Ә ; ! "guilt"
күнә:күн N1-Ә ; ! "sin"
көбісі:көбі N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" FIXME CHECK pos, not really a noun
митинг:митинг N5 ; ! ""
облыс:облыс N1 ; ! "oblast"
санкция:санкция N5 ; ! ""
соң:соң N-COMPOUND-PX ; !
субъект:субъект N6 ; ! ""
галактика:галактика N5 ; ! "galaxy"
БАҚ:БАҚ%{а%} N1-ABBR ; ! "mass media"
млн:млн%{а%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "million"
млрд:млрд%{а%}%{с%} N1-ABBR ; ! "billion"
мм:мм%{э%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "mm"
арт:арт N-INFL-NKI ; ! "back"
аст:аст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "under"
аст:ас%{т%} N-INFL-NKI ; ! "down side"
үст:үст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "top"
артефакт:артефакт N6 ;
жатыпішер:жатыпішер N1 ; !"Use/MT"
ортасы:орта N-COMPOUND-PX ; !"Use/MT" ! FIXME: CHECK
факт:факт N6 ; ! "fact"
тағамдас:тағамдас N1 ; ! ""
еркесі:ерке N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Барақкөл:Барақкөл NP-TOP ; ! ""
Каир:Каир NP-TOP ; ! "Cairo"
Балтық:Балтық NP-TOP ; ! ""
Венди:Венди NP-ANT-F ; !"Use/MT"
Аг:Аг NP-ANT-M ; !"Use/MT"
Кая:Кая NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Күнке:Күнке NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Стив:Стив NP-ANT-M ; !"Use/MT"
Хадиша:Хадиша NP-ANT-F ; ! "Xadıysha" (Arabic)
Янукович:Януко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Анатольевич:Анатолье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Гашпорович:Гашпоро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! "" ! Use/MT
Горький:Горький NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Репин:Репин NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Глущенко:Глущенко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кушнаренко:Кушнаренко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Фицджеральд:Фицджеральд NP-COG-MF ; !"Use/MT"
Боқаев:Боқаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Калинин:Калинин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Ксенофонтов:Ксенофонтов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мухин:Мухин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Савуков:Савуков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Тәжін:Тәжін NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Iberdrola:Iberdrola NP-ORG-LAT ; !"T"
Amway:Amway NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Wrigley:Wrigley NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
ҚМЭБИ:ҚМЭБИ NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! "KIMEP"
Гардиан:Гардиан NP-ORG ; ! ""
ЖСДП:ЖСДП NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! "Жалпыұлттық социал демократиялық партия=Гомуммилли Социаль Демократик Партия=International Social Democratic Party"
КАФ:КАФ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
КОНМЕБОЛ:КОНМЕБОЛ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
Пасха:Пасха NP-ORG ; !"Use/MT"
ФИФА:ФИФА NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! ""
Шеврон:Шеврон NP-ORG ; ! ""
Time:Time NP-AL ; ! ""
Взгляд:Взгляд NP-AL ; ! ""
Рено:Рено NP-AL ; ! ""
Бағдад:Бағдад NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Кухруд:Кухруд NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Серхед:Серхед NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Тебриз:Тебриз NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
барлық:барлық ADV ; ! "overall" Use/MT
бүгін:бүгін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "today > today's"   FIXME: takes abl, dat, ...
былтыр:былтыр ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "last year > last year's"
күндіз:күндіз ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "during the day"
бері:бер ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "on the near side"
жоғары:жоғар ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "high"
ақыры:ақыр ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "at last, finally / the last __"
венгрше:венгрше ADV-LANG ; ! "Hungarian" FIXME
күрдше:күрдше ADV-LANG ; ! ""
непалша:непалша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
словакше:словакше ADV-LANG ; ! ""
конституциялы:конституциялы ADV ; !"Use/MT"
елгезектене:елгезектене ADV ; !"Use/MT"
 LEXICON Abbreviations
ӘЧ:ӘЧ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
LEXICON Guesser
Боголюбский:Боголюбский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
ЖХЛ:ЖХЛ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
ЖКО:ЖКО NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
МТ:МТ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
LEXICON Common ! <- future
   ъ | э | ю | я )> LTR ;
Бум:Бум NP ;
ДСҰ:ДСҰ NP ;
Жантық:Жантық NP ;
Нұрғазина:Нұрғазина NP ;
Ыбыраева:Ыбыраева NP ;
